Utah statutes.
10-9a-402.   Information and technical assistance from the state.

Each state official, department, and agency shall:

(1)  promptly deliver any data and information requested by a municipality unless the disclosure is prohibited by Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and

(2)  furnish any other technical assistance and advice that they have available to the municipality without additional cost to the municipality.

